Hawaii statutes.
[§198D-10] Limitation on chapter's
provisions. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as conferring
or imposing upon the department any rights, powers, and duties over:

(1) Lands not under its jurisdiction; or

(2) The activities of other public agencies; except
if provided by other law or agreement.

(b) The designation as part of the statewide
trail and access system of trails and accesses, the use to which the public has
no rights, shall not be construed as establishing public rights to use those
trails and accesses. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next